North Carolina, session 2025, SB271.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-63-15(8)b.4. and G.S. 58-63-16 are repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 58-63-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-63-15. Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices
defined.
The following are hereby defined as unfair methods of competition and unfair and deceptive
acts or practices in the business of insurance:
…
(8) Rebates. –
…
b. Nothing in subdivision (7) or paragraph a of subdivision (8) of this
section shall be construed as including within the definition of
discrimination or rebates any of the following practices:
…
5. Engaging in an arrangement that would not violate section 106
of the Bank Holding Company Act Amendments of 1972 (12
U.S.C. § 1972), as interpreted by the Board of Governors of
the Federal Reserve System, or section 5(q) of the Home
Owners' Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1464(q).
6. The offer or provision by insurers or producers, by or through
employees, affiliates, or third-party representatives, of
value-added products or services at no or reduced cost when
such products or services are not specified in the policy of
insurance if all of the following criteria are met:
I. Relates to the insurance coverage and is primarily
designed to satisfy one or more of the following:
A. Providing loss mitigation or loss control.
B. Reducing claim costs or claim settlement costs.
C. Providing education about liability risks or risk
of loss to persons or property.
*S271-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
D. Monitoring or assessing risk, identifying
sources of risk, or developing strategies for
eliminating or reducing risk.
E. Enhancing health.
F. Enhancing financial wellness through items
such as education or financial planning
services.
G. Providing post-loss services.
H. Incentivizing behavioral changes to improve
the health or reduce the risk of death or
disability of a customer. For purposes of this
sub-sub-sub-sub-subdivision, "customer"
means a policyholder, potential policyholder,
certificate holder, potential certificate holder,
insured, potential insured, or applicant.
I. Assisting in the administration of the employee
or retiree benefit insurance coverage.
II. The cost to the insurer or producer offering the product
or service to any given customer must be reasonable in
comparison to that customer's premiums or insurance
coverage for the policy class.
III. If the insurer or producer is providing the product or
service offered, the insurer or producer must ensure
that the customer is provided with contact information
to assist the customer with questions regarding the
product or service.
IV. The availability of the value-added product or service
must be based on documented objective criteria and
offered in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory.
The documented criteria must be maintained by the
insurer or producer and produced upon request by the
Department.
7. The offer or provision of products or services that otherwise
meet the criteria of sub-sub-subdivision 6. of this
sub-subdivision, where the insurer or producer does not have
sufficient evidence to demonstrate but has a good-faith belief
that the products or service satisfies one or more of the
conditions listed in sub-sub-sub-sub-subdivisions A. through I.
of sub-sub-sub-subdivision I. of sub-sub-subdivision 6. of this
sub-subdivision. The products and services shall be offered or
provided in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory as part
of a pilot or testing program for no more than one year. An
insurer or producer offering or providing products or services
pursuant to this sub-sub-subdivision must notify the
Department of the pilot or testing program prior to
implementation and may proceed with the program unless the
Department objects within 21 days of notice.
8. The offer or gifting by an insurer or producer of noncash gifts,
items, or services, including meals to or charitable donations
on behalf of a customer, if all of the following criteria are met:
Page 2 Senate Bill 271-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
I. The noncash gifts, items, or services are made to, or on
behalf of, customers, including commercial or
institutional customers, in connection with the
marketing, sale, purchase, or retention of contracts of
insurance.
II. The cost of the noncash gifts, items, or services does
not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per
policy term.
III. The offer or gift is made in a manner that is not unfairly
discriminatory.
IV. The customer is not required to purchase, continue to
purchase, or renew a policy in exchange for the offer or
gift.
9. The conducting of drawings or raffles by an insurer or
producer, to the extent they are otherwise permitted by law, if
all of the following criteria are met:
I. There is no financial cost to entrants to participate in
the drawing or raffle.
II. The drawing or raffle does not obligate participants to
purchase insurance.
III. The prizes of the drawing or raffle are not valued in
excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).
IV. The drawing or raffle is open to the public and
conducted in a manner that is not unfairly
discriminatory.
V. The customer is not required to purchase, continue to
purchase, or renew a policy in exchange for
participation in the drawing or raffle.
c. No insurer or employee thereof, and no insurance producer shall pay,
allow, or give, or offer to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as
an inducement to insurance, or after insurance has been effected, any
rebate, discount, abatement, credit or reduction of the premium named
in a policy of insurance, or any special favor or advantage in the
dividends or other benefits to accrue thereon, or any valuable
consideration or inducement whatever, not specified in the policy of
insurance. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as prohibiting
prohibiting: (i) the payment of commissions or other compensation to
regularly appointed and licensed insurance producers duly licensed by
this State; nor as prohibiting State, (ii) any participating insurer from
distributing to its policyholders dividends, savings or the unused or
unabsorbed portion of premiums and premium deposits.deposits, or
(iii) the trade practices permitted by sub-subdivision b. of this
subdivision.
d. An insurer, producer, or representative of either may not offer or
provide insurance as an inducement to the purchase of another policy
or otherwise use the words "free," "no cost," or words of similar
import, in an advertisement.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 58-33-85 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-85. Rebates and charges in excess of premium prohibited; exceptions.
Senate Bill 271-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) No insurer, insurance producer, or limited representative shall knowingly charge,
demand or receive a premium for any policy of insurance except in accordance with the
applicable filing approved by the Commissioner. No insurer, insurance producer, or limited
representative shall pay, allow, or give, or offer to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as
an inducement to insurance, or after insurance has been effected, any rebate, discount, abatement,
credit, or reduction of the premium named in a policy of insurance, or any special favor or
advantage in the dividends or other benefits to accrue thereon, or any valuable consideration or
inducement whatever, not specified in the policy of insurance. No insured named in a policy of
insurance, nor any employee of such insured, shall knowingly receive or accept, directly or
indirectly, any such rebate, discount, abatement or reduction of premium, or any special favor or
advantage or valuable consideration or inducement. Nothing herein contained shall be construed
as prohibiting (i) the payment of commissions or other compensation to duly licensed insurance
producers and limited representatives, (ii) any participating insurer from distributing to its
policyholders dividends, savings or the unused or unabsorbed portion of premiums and premium
deposits, or (iii) the trade practices permitted by G.S. 58-63-16. sub-subdivision b. of subdivision
(8) of G.S. 58-63-15. As used in this section the word "insurance" includes suretyship and the
word "policy" includes bond.
…."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to trade practices
related to insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
Page 4 Senate Bill 271-First Edition